Hawaii statutes.
§502-63 Not recorded unless initialed.
No instrument acknowledged in the State of Hawaii in which there are
interlineations, erasures, or changes shall be recorded by the registrar,
unless the same are duly initialed by the officer or officers taking the
acknowledgment or acknowledgments to the same in the State of Hawaii.

No instrument acknowledged outside of the State
of Hawaii in which there are interlineations, erasures, or changes shall be
recorded by the registrar, unless the same are duly initialed by either:

(1) The parties to such instrument; or

(2) The officer or officers taking the acknowledgment
or acknowledgments to the same. [L 1896, c 55, §3; RL 1925, §3162; RL 1935,
§5148; RL 1945, §12748; RL 1955, §343-41; am L 1963, c 83, §5; HRS §502-63; am
L 1992, c 197, §12]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next